Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-902
Nebraska Missing Persons Day.

October 17 of each year shall be recognized as Nebraska Missing Persons Day. Nebraska Missing Persons Day is observed not only for the missing people, but also for their families and friends who deal with the trauma of having their loved one go missing without a trace. This day respects and honors their grief.

Laws 2024, LB1102, § 1.